North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7. Courts. [Repealed]
§§ 7-1 through 7-456.
[Repealed]

Repealed and transferred.

Cross References.

As to the judicial department, see now Chapter 7A.

Editor’s Note.

The various sections of this chapter were repealed by Session Laws 1943, c. 746; 1955, c. 1317, s. 1; 1956, c. 1016, s. 2; 1965, c. 310, s. 4; 1967, c. 108, s. 12; c. 691, s. 59; c. 1049, s. 6; 1969, c. 1190, s. 57; and 1971, c. 377, s. 32.

Session Laws 1969, c. 1190, ss. 36 and 39 to 49 transferred G.S. 7-42, 7-52 to 7-55, 7-58, 7-60, 7-61.1, 7-62, 7-65, 7-70.2, 7-72, 7-73, 7-73.1, 7-76, 7-78, 7-80, and 7-83 to the following sections of Chapter 7A:

G.S. 7A-42

, 7A-44 to 7A-47.1, 7A-47.3 to 7A-49.2, and 7A-96. Session Laws 1971, c. 377, s. 1 transferred the seventh paragraph of G.S. 7-89 to

G.S. 8-85

. Session Laws 1971, c. 377, s. 1.1 transferred G.S. 7-448 to 7-456 to

G.S. 7A-400

to 7A-408 (now repealed).